Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,113
Examining board; record of proceedings; roster of professional land surveyors.

The examining board shall keep a complete record of all its proceedings which, together with all other records and files of the examining board, shall be filed in the office of the State Surveyor. A roster showing the names and places of business of all professional land surveyors shall be prepared by the secretary of the examining board each year. Copies of this roster shall be sent to all professional land surveyors and shall be furnished to the public on request.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 6, p. 1334;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 29.
September 1, 2024